Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.  ORS 204.020 is amended to read:
204.020. (1) The term of office of each officer  elected pursuant to ORS 204.005 commences on the
first Monday of January next following election to office.
(2) Before entering upon any elective office listed in ORS 204.005, the person [ elected] who has
received a certificate  of election  must qualify by filing with the county clerk of the county in
which the  person is elected the person’s [ certificate of election, with an ] oath of office , [ indorsed
thereon, and ] subscribed by the [ elected] person, to the effect that the person will support the  Con-
stitution of the United States and of this state, and faithfully carry out the  office being assumed.
The person  shall also give and file the undertaking provided for under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A county governing body may require, by ordinance, for the filing by each  officer under ORS
204.005, prior to that officer  assuming office, of an official undertaking with such surety as the
governing body determines necessary or of an irrevocable letter  of credit issued by an insured in-
stitution, as  defined in ORS 706.008, in either case in a reasonable amount with the county govern-
ing body.
SECTION 2.  ORS 246.021 is amended to read:
246.021. (1) Except as  provided in ORS 247.012 and subsection (2) of this section, an election
document and an accompanying payment of fees required to be filed with  the Secretary of State,
county clerk or other filing officer must  be delivered to and actually received at the office of the
designated officer not later than 5 p.m. of the day the document or fee is due or,  if the day due is
a Saturday, Sunday or holiday, on the next business day.
(2) If, at 5 p.m. of the day an election document is due, an individual is  physically present in the
office of the secretary, county clerk or other filing officer and in line waiting  to deliver the docu-
ment, the individual is considered to have begun the act  of delivering the document and is permitted
to file it.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 1
(3) Except as provided in ORS 253.690, any election document  required to be filed with the filing
officer other than ballots,  voter registration cards or petitions requiring signatures of electors may
also be filed by means of an electronic facsimile transmission machine  or electronic mail . If an
election document is required  to be filed by a specified time, the entire document must be received
[in] at  the office  of the filing officer not later than 5 p.m. of the day the document is due or, if the
day due is a Saturday, Sunday or holiday, on the next business day.
(4) Notwithstanding any provision of subsections (1) to (3) of this section,  if a statement is re-
quired to be filed electronically under ORS 260.057:
(a) The  statement must be received electronically at the office of the Secretary of State not later
than 11:59 p.m. of the day the statement is due or, if the day due is a Saturday, Sunday or holiday,
on the next business day; and
(b) The Secretary of State may not accept the filing of  the statement in any form other than an
electronic  format.
(5) As used in this section, “election document” includes, but is not limited to,  a declaration of
candidacy for nomination for public or political party office, completed nominating petitions,  state-
ments and portraits for  voters’ pamphlets, statements of election campaign contributions and ex-
penditures, and initiative, referendum or recall petitions.
SECTION 3.  ORS 247.420 is amended to read:
247.420. (1) A county clerk shall  give a ballot marked “[ Presidential] Federal only” to any per-
son eligible under ORS 247.410 who personally appears  in the office of the county clerk, completes
a registration card and verifies eligibility to vote under ORS 247.410.
(2) No person  shall supply any information under subsection (1) of this section, knowing it to
be false.
SECTION 4.  ORS 254.515 is amended to read:
254.515. Ballots marked  “[ Presidential] Federal  only” may be counted only for the offices for
which the elector is entitled to vote. Votes on the ballot for other offices may not be counted.
SECTION 5.  ORS 248.007 is amended to read:
248.007. (1) Subject to ORS 248.005, a major political party may organize and select delegates
to national party conventions in any manner.
(2) The provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315 do not  apply to a major political party if the party
has notified the Secretary of State as provided in  subsection (5) of this section that the party does
not intend to be subject to  the provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315. References to precinct com-
mitteepersons in any provisions of ORS chapters 246 to 260 do not  apply to a party described in this
subsection.
(3) ORS 248.012 to 248.315 apply only to a major political party  that has notified the Secretary
of State as provided in subsection (5) of this section that the political  party intends to be subject
to the provisions of ORS 248.012  to 248.315. References to precinct committeepersons in any pro-
visions of ORS chapters 246 to 260 shall apply to a party described in this subsection. If  a major
political party fails to notify the Secretary of State under this subsection, the party shall be con-
sidered subject to the provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315.
(4) A major political party shall notify the Secretary of State as provided in subsection (5) of
this section if the party does not intend to be  subject to the provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315
except that the party intends to elect precinct committeepersons.  If a party notifies the Secretary
of State under  this subsection, the party shall elect precinct committeepersons only as provided in
ORS 248.015 and shall elect precinct committeepersons in the same manner in all precincts  in this
state.
(5) Not later than the [ 274th] 271st day before the date  of the primary election, a major political
party shall notify the Secretary of State in writing whether or not the party intends to be  subject
to the provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315 or whether the party  intends to elect precinct com-
mitteepersons under subsection (4) of this section. If the major political party does  not intend to be
subject to the provisions of ORS 248.012 to 248.315 or intends to elect  precinct committeepersons
under subsection (4) of this section, the party shall file with  the Secretary of State, at the same time
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 2
notice is given under this  subsection, a copy of its organizational documents setting forth the man-
ner in which its officers  and managing committees are selected or any other manner in which it
conducts its affairs.
(6) In each even-numbered year, a major political party shall file  with the Secretary of State a
statement indicating that the party is operating subject to ORS 248.012 to 248.315 or a copy  of
current organizational documents setting  forth the manner in which its officers and managing com-
mittees are selected or any other  manner in which it conducts its affairs. Material described in this
subsection shall be  filed [ on the 274th ] between the 271st and the 277th  day before the third
Tuesday in May of each odd-numbered year.
(7) A major political party  subject to the provisions of this section shall nominate candidates
of the major political party, for other than political party office, at the primary election.
SECTION 6.  ORS 248.006 is amended to read:
248.006. (1) An affiliation of  electors becomes a major political party in this state and is quali-
fied to make nominations at a primary election when a number of electors equal to  at least five
percent of the number of electors registered in this state are registered as members  of the party not
later than the 275th day before the date of a primary election. An affiliation  of electors satisfying
the requirements of this subsection shall be subject to the provisions of  ORS 248.007 on the date the
Secretary of State determines the registration requirements are satisfied.
(2) The number of electors described in subsection (1) of this section shall be calculated  based
on the number of electors registered in this state and eligible to vote, as reported on  the official
abstracts of the election, at the general election  immediately preceding the deadline specified in
subsection (1) of this section.
(3) After an affiliation of electors  becomes a major political party under subsection (1) of this
section, in order to maintain status  as a major political party subject to ORS 248.007, the party must
satisfy the registration requirement of subsection (1) of this section not later than  the 275th day
before each primary election.
(4) An affiliation of electors ceases to be a major political party if the registration requirements
of subsection (1) of this  section are not satisfied by the 275th day before each primary election. The
affiliation of electors ceases to be a major  political party on the date the Secretary of State deter-
mines that the registration requirement is not satisfied.
(5) When an affiliation of electors has not satisfied the registration requirement of subsection
(1) of this section for the first time, at the request  of a representative of the affiliation of electors,
the Secretary of  State shall determine not less than once each month whether at least five percent
of the number of eligible electors registered in this state are registered as members of  the party.
After an affiliation of electors has qualified as a major political party,  the Secretary of State shall
determine on the [ 274th] 271st  day before each primary election whether  the major political party
has satisfied the registration requirements described in subsection (3) of this section.
NOTE: Sections 7 through 13  were deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not re-
numbered.
SECTION 14.  ORS 250.052 is amended to read:
250.052. (1)(a) For  each state initiative, referendum or recall petition, the Secretary of State
shall prepare official templates of the cover and signature sheets for  the petition. Except as pro-
vided in this section, templates of cover and signature sheets for state initiative and  referendum
petitions  are  subject to the requirements of ORS 250.045. The templates of signature sheets to be
used by persons who are being paid to obtain signatures  on the petition shall be a different color
from the sheets to be used by persons who are not being paid to obtain signatures on the petition.
(b) For each prospective petition for a state measure to be initiated  the secretary shall prepare
official templates of  the cover and signature sheets. The templates of signature sheets to be used
by persons who are being paid  to obtain signatures on the prospective petition shall be a different
color  from  the sheets to be used by persons who are not being paid to obtain signatures on the
prospective petition. Each signature sheet for the prospective petition shall:
(A) Contain a notice describing the meaning of the color of the signature sheet; and
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 3
(B) If one or more persons will be paid for obtaining signatures of electors  on the prospective
petition, contain a notice stating: “Some Circulators  For This Prospective Petition Are Being
Paid.” The notice shall be in boldfaced type and shall be prominently displayed on the sheet.
(2) A person obtaining signatures on a state initiative, referendum or  recall petition or a pro-
spective petition for a state measure to be initiated may use only the cover  and signature sheets
contained in the official templates prepared for  the petition or prospective petition. A person who
is being paid to obtain signatures on the petition or prospective  petition shall use the signature
sheet template designated for use by persons being paid to obtain signatures. A person who is not
being paid to obtain signatures on the petition or prospective petition shall use the  signature sheet
template designated for use by persons who are not being paid to obtain signatures.
(3) The secretary shall issue templates for a petition or prospective petition only to a chief
petitioner of the petition or prospective petition or to an agent designated by a chief petitioner.
(4) The secretary shall issue official templates to a  chief petitioner or designated agent not later
than:
(a) Three business days after the deadline for filing a petition under  ORS 250.085 relating to a
ballot title certified by the Attorney General for the state  initiative petition or, if a petition is filed
with the Supreme Court under ORS 250.085, three business days  after the Supreme Court certifies
to the secretary [ of State ] a ballot title for the state initiative petition;
(b) Three business days after a prospective petition is  filed under ORS 249.865 or 250.045 for a
state recall petition or state referendum petition; or
(c) Three business days after the chief petitioner files  a statement with the secretary under ORS
250.045 (2) for a prospective petition for a state measure to be initiated.
(5) [Not later than five business days after the  deadline for the secretary to issue templates under
subsection (4) of this section, ] The secretary by rule shall establish a  process by which  a chief
petitioner of a state  initiative, referendum or recall petition or a prospective petition for a state
measure to be initiated [ may submit to the secretary a written ] may  request [ for] a  modification of
the templates  issued under subsection (4)  of this section . [ The secretary shall approve or disap-
prove the request not later than five business days after  receiving the request. If the secretary disap-
proves the request, the secretary shall advise the  chief petitioner in writing of the reasons for the
disapproval.]
(6) In addition to  the templates prepared under subsections (1) to (5) of this section, for each
state initiative, referendum or recall petition  or  prospective petition , the secretary shall prepare
an official  electronic template of a signature sheet for the petition  or prospective petition . A
template prepared under this subsection shall allow space for  the signature of one elector. An
elector may print a copy of the electronic signature sheet for a petition  or prospective petition ,
sign the sheet and deliver the signed sheet to a chief petitioner or an agent designated by a  chief
petitioner. Electronic templates described in this subsection  are subject to the requirements of ORS
250.045, other than ORS 250.045 (6), (9) and (10).
(7) The secretary shall adopt  rules prescribing the contents and method of production of official
templates required under this section.
SECTION 15.
 ORS 250.067 is amended to read:
250.067. (1) The Secretary of State, upon receiving a draft ballot  title from the Attorney General
under ORS 250.065 or 250.075, shall provide reasonable statewide notice  of having received the draft
ballot title and of  the public’s right to submit written comments as provided in this section. Written
comments concerning a draft ballot title  may be submitted to the secretary not later than the 10th
business day after the secretary receives the draft title from the  Attorney General. On the next
business day after the deadline for submitting comments,  the secretary shall send a copy of all
written comments to the Attorney General.  The secretary shall maintain a record of written com-
ments received.
(2)(a) If written comments  are submitted to the secretary under subsection (1) of this section,
the Attorney General shall consider the comments and certify to the secretary either the draft ballot
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 4
title or  a revised ballot title not later than the 10th business day after receiving the comments from
the secretary.
(b) If no written comments  are submitted to the secretary, the Attorney General shall certify
the draft ballot title not later than  the [ 20th] 21st business day after the secretary receives the draft
title from the  Attorney General. If the Attorney General determines that a draft ballot title de-
scribed in this  paragraph contains a clerical error, the Attorney General may correct the error be-
fore certifying the corrected draft ballot title to the secretary.
(c) If the Attorney General determines that a  ballot title certified under this subsection contains
a clerical error, the Attorney General  may correct the error and certify to the secretary a corrected
ballot title not later than the 10th business day after the date the ballot title was certified.
(d) The secretary shall furnish the chief petitioner with a copy of each  ballot title certified un-
der this subsection.
(3) Unless the Supreme Court  certifies a different ballot title, the latest ballot title certified by
the Attorney General under subsection (2) of this  section is the title to be printed in the voters’
pamphlet and on the ballot.
(4) If a petition is filed with the Supreme Court as provided in ORS 250.085, the Secretary of
State shall file with the Supreme Court a copy of the  written comments received as part of the re-
cord on review of the ballot title.
(5) The secretary by rule shall specify the means for providing reasonable  statewide notice for
submitting comments on a draft ballot title.
(6) As used in this section, “clerical error” means a typographical, arithmetical or grammatical
error or omission that is evident from  the text of the draft or certified ballot title or by comparison
of the text of the draft or certified ballot title with a written explanation that was provided  by the
Attorney General and issued concurrently with the draft or certified ballot title.
SECTION 16.  ORS 250.065 is amended to read:
250.065. (1) When a prospective petition for a state measure to be referred is  filed with the
Secretary  of  State, the secretary shall authorize the circulation of the petition using the final
measure summary of the latest version of the  printed, engrossed measure in lieu of the ballot title.
On the next business day after the referendum petition has been filed containing the required  num-
ber of verified signatures,  the Secretary of State shall send [ two copies ] one copy of the prospective
petition to the Attorney General.
(2) When an  approved prospective petition for a state measure to be initiated is filed with the
Secretary of State, the secretary immediately shall send [ two copies ] one copy  of it to the Attorney
General.
(3) Not later than the fifth business day after receiving the [ copies] copy of the prospective pe-
tition for a state measure to be initiated, the Attorney General shall provide a draft ballot title  for
the state measure to be  initiated and [ return] send  one copy of the [ prospective petition and the ]
ballot title to the Secretary of State.
(4) Not later than the 10th business day after receiving the [ copies] copy of the  prospective pe-
tition for a state measure  to be referred, the Attorney General shall provide a draft ballot title for
the state measure to be referred and [ return] send one copy of the [ prospective petition and the ] draft
ballot title to the Secretary of State.
SECTION 17.  ORS 250.075 is amended to read:
250.075. (1) When the Legislative Assembly refers a measure to the  people, a ballot title for the
measure may be  prepared by the assembly. The ballot title shall be filed with the Secretary of State
when the measure is filed with the Secretary of State.
(2) If the title is not prepared under subsection  (1) of this section, when the measure is filed
with the Secretary of State,  the secretary shall send [ two copies ] one copy  of the referred measure
to the Attorney General. Not later than the 30th day after the Legislative  Assembly adjourns, the
Attorney General shall provide a draft ballot title for the measure. The Attorney General  shall send
a copy of the draft  ballot title to each member of the Legislative Assembly, and file with the Sec-
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 5
retary of State a copy of the  [referred measure and the ] draft ballot title and a certificate of mailing
of the draft ballot title to each member.
SECTION 18.  ORS 250.175 is amended to read:
250.175. (1) When  a prospective petition for a county measure to be referred is filed with the
county clerk, the  clerk shall authorize the circulation of the petition containing the title of the
measure as enacted by the county governing body  or, if there is no title, the title supplied by the
petitioner filing the prospective petition. The county clerk immediately shall send [ two copies ] one
copy of the prospective petition to the district attorney.
(2) Not later than the sixth business day after a prospective petition for a  county measure to
be initiated is filed with the county clerk, the clerk shall send [ two copies ] one copy  of  it to the
district attorney if the measure to be initiated has been  determined to be in compliance with section
1 (2)(d), Article IV, and section 10, Article VI of the Oregon Constitution, as provided in ORS
250.168.
(3)(a) Not later than the fifth business day after receiving  the [ copies] copy  of the prospective
petition, and notwithstanding ORS 203.145 (3), the district attorney shall prepare  a ballot title for
the county measure to be initiated or referred and [ return one  copy of the prospective petition and ]
certify the ballot title to the county clerk.
(b) If the district attorney determines that a ballot title  certified under this subsection contains
a clerical error, the district attorney may correct  the error and certify to the county clerk a cor-
rected ballot title not later than the 10th business day after the date the ballot title was certified.
(c) A copy of the ballot title shall be furnished to the chief petitioner.
(4) Unless the circuit court certifies a different ballot title, the latest  ballot title certified by the
district attorney under subsection (3) of this section is the title to be printed on the ballot.
(5)(a) The county clerk, upon receiving a ballot title for a county measure to  be referred or in-
itiated from the district attorney or the county governing body, shall publish in the next  available
edition of a newspaper of general  circulation in the county a notice of receipt of the ballot title
including notice that an elector may file a petition for review of the  ballot title not later than the
date referred to in ORS 250.195.
(b) In addition to publishing a notice as described  in paragraph (a) of this subsection, the county
clerk may publish a notice on the county’s website for a minimum of seven days.
(6) As used in this section, “clerical error” means a typographical, arithmetical or grammatical
error or omission  that is evident from the text of the certified ballot title or by comparison of the
text of the ballot title with a written explanation that was provided  by the district attorney and
issued concurrently with the certified ballot title.
SECTION 19.
 ORS 250.185 is amended to read:
250.185. (1) When the county governing  body refers a measure to the people, a ballot title for
the measure may be prepared by the body. The measure and the ballot title prepared under this
subsection shall be filed at the same time with the county clerk.
(2) If the title is not prepared under subsection  (1) of this section, when the measure is filed
with the county clerk, the  clerk shall send [ two copies ] one copy to the district attorney. Not later
than the fifth business day after receiving the [ copies] copy,  the district attorney shall provide a
ballot title for the measure and send a  copy of it to the county governing body and the county clerk.
SECTION 20.
 ORS 250.275 is amended to read:
250.275. (1) When a prospective petition for a city  measure to be referred is filed with the city
elections officer, the officer shall  authorize the circulation of the petition containing the title of the
measure as enacted by the city governing body or, if there is no title, the  title supplied by the
petitioner  filing  the prospective petition. The city elections officer immediately shall send [ two
copies] one copy  of the prospective petition to the city attorney.
(2) Not later than the sixth business day after a  prospective petition for a city measure to be
initiated is filed with the city elections officer, the officer  shall send [ two copies ] one copy  of it to
the city attorney  if the measure to be initiated has been determined to be in compliance with section
1 (2)(d) and (5), Article IV of the Oregon Constitution, as provided in ORS 250.270.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 6
(3)(a) Not later than the fifth business  day after receiving the [ copies] copy of the prospective
petition, the city attorney shall provide a ballot title for the city measure to be initiated or referred
and [ return one copy of the prospective petition and ] certify the  ballot title to the city elections offi-
cer.
(b) If the city attorney determines that a ballot title certified under this subsection contains a
clerical error, the city attorney may correct the error and certify  to the city elections officer a
corrected ballot title not later than the 10th business day after the date the ballot title was certified.
(c) A copy of the ballot title shall be furnished to the chief petitioner.
(4) Unless the circuit court certifies a different ballot title, the latest  ballot title certified by the
city attorney under subsection (3) of this section is the title to be printed on the ballot.
(5)(a) The city elections officer, upon receiving  a ballot title for a city measure to be referred
or initiated from the city attorney or city governing body, shall publish in the  next available edition
of a newspaper of general distribution in the  city a notice of receipt of the ballot title including
notice that an elector may file a petition for review of the ballot title not  later than the date re-
ferred to in ORS 250.296.
(b) In addition to publishing a notice as described in paragraph (a) of this  subsection, the city
elections officer may publish a notice on the city’s website for a minimum of seven days.
(6) As used in this section, “clerical error” means a typographical, arithmetical or grammatical
error or omission that is evident from the text of the certified ballot title or by comparison  of the
text of the ballot title with a written explanation  that was provided by the city attorney and issued
concurrently with the certified ballot title.
SECTION 21.
 ORS 250.285 is amended to read:
250.285. (1) When the city governing body  refers a measure to the people, a ballot title for the
measure may be prepared by the body. The ballot title shall be filed with the city elections officer.
(2) If the title is not prepared under subsection (1)  of this section, when the measure is filed
with the city elections officer, the officer shall send [ two copies ] one copy to the city attorney. Not
later than the fifth business day after receiving the [ copies] copy, the city attorney shall provide a
ballot title for the measure[ ,] and send a copy of it to the city governing body and the city  elections
officer.
SECTION 22.  ORS 255.145 is amended to read:
255.145. (1) When a prospective petition for a district measure to be  referred is filed with the
elections officer, the officer shall  authorize the circulation of the petition containing the title of the
measure as enacted by the district elections authority or, if  there is no title, the title supplied by
the petitioner filing  the prospective petition. The elections officer immediately shall send [two
copies] one copy  of the prospective petition to  the district attorney of the county in which the ad-
ministrative office of the district is located.
(2) Not later than the sixth business  day after a prospective petition for a district measure to
be initiated is filed with the  elections officer, the officer shall send [ two copies ] one copy  of it to
the district attorney of the county in which the administrative  office of the district is located if the
measure to be initiated has been  determined to be in compliance with section 1 (2)(d) and (5), Article
IV of the Oregon Constitution, as provided in ORS 255.140.
(3)(a) Not  later than the fifth business day after receiving the [ copies] copy of the prospective
petition, the district attorney  shall provide a ballot title for the district measure to be initiated or
referred and [ return] send one copy of the [ prospective petition  and the ] ballot title to the elections
officer. Unless the circuit court certifies a  different title, or the district attorney determines that
a clerical correction is necessary,  this ballot title shall be the title printed on the ballot.
(b) As used in  this subsection, “clerical correction” means a typographical, arithmetical
or grammatical correction that is evident from the text of the draft or certified ballot title.
(4) A copy of the ballot title shall be furnished to the chief petitioner.
(5)(a) The elections officer, upon receiving a ballot title for a district measure  to be referred or
initiated from the district attorney,  shall publish in the next available edition of a newspaper of
general circulation in the district a  notice of receipt of the ballot title including notice that an
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 7
elector may file a petition for review of the ballot title not later than the date referred  to in ORS
255.155.
(b) In addition to publishing a notice as described in paragraph (a) of  this subsection, the
elections officer may publish a notice on the county’s website for a minimum of seven days.
SECTION 23.  ORS 250.141 is amended to read:
250.141. (1) Not later  than the date set by the Secretary of State by rule, each citizen panel shall
prepare and file with  the secretary any of the following statements of not more than 250 words each:
(a) A statement in favor of the measure.
(b) A statement opposed to the measure.
(c) A statement that “No panelist took this position.”  if a panel is unanimous in either sup-
porting or opposing a measure.
(d) A statement of key findings that summarizes the citizen  panel’s findings in an impartial
manner and may include a tally of how many panelists agreed with the key findings.
(e) A statement of additional policy considerations that describes the subject  matter of or any
fiscal considerations related to the measure. A statement submitted under this paragraph  must be
supported by at least three-quarters of the panelists.
(2)(a) Before a statement is filed with the Secretary of State under subsection (1) of  this section:
(A) A person  designated under ORS 250.139 (6)(c) shall be allowed to review the statement in
favor of the measure by the  citizen panel and provide feedback to the panel regarding the statement.
(B) A person designated under ORS 250.139 (6)(d) shall be allowed to review the statement op-
posed to the measure by the citizen panel and provide feedback to the  panel regarding the state-
ment.
(C) A person designated under ORS 250.139 (6)(c) or (d)  shall be allowed to review the statement
of key findings by the citizen panel and provide feedback to the panel regarding the statement.
(b) A citizen panel may adjust any statement after receiving feedback as  described in this sub-
section.
(3) The secretary shall prescribe the size and manner of placement of  the statements submitted
by a citizen panel to be printed in the voters’ pamphlet, except that the statements shall  be clearly
differentiated from other arguments or statements in the voters’ pamphlet and may include, but  are
not limited to, the use of unique formatting and informative symbols.
(4) The secretary shall provide with any citizen panel statement a description of not more  than
150 words of the citizen panel process described in ORS 250.137 to 250.149 and the following expla-
nation:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
The opinions expressed in this statement are  those of the members of a citizen panel and were
developed through the citizen review process. They are NOT official opinions or positions  endorsed
by the State of Oregon or any government agency. A citizen panel is not a judge of  the
constitutionality or legality  of any ballot measure, and any statements about such matters are not
binding on a court of law.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(5) A statement described in subsection (1)  of this section must be filed using the elec-
tronic filing system adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.014.
[(5)] (6)  The secretary, by rule, shall set a date by which statements must be filed under this
section. The date may not be sooner than the 70th day before the date of the election.
SECTION 24.  ORS 251.115 is amended to read:
251.115. (1) Not sooner than the 120th  day and not later than the 70th day before the general
election, the party officers as designated in the organizational documents of any statewide  political
party or assembly of electors having nominated candidates may file with the Secretary of State  a
statement of arguments for the success of its principles and  election of its candidates on a statewide
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 8
basis and opposing the principles and  candidates of other political parties or organizations on a
statewide basis.
(2) Not sooner than the 120th day and  not later than the 70th  day before the general election,
the party officers as designated in the  organizational documents of any less than statewide political
party or assembly of electors having nominated candidates may file with the Secretary of State  a
statement of arguments for the success of its principles and election of its candidates on a  county
basis and opposing the principles and candidates of other political  parties or organizations on a
county basis.
(3)(a) Any statewide political party or assembly of electors having nominated candidates shall
pay a fee of $1,200 to  the Secretary of State when the statement is filed or may submit a petition
in a form prescribed by the secretary containing the signatures of 500 active electors.
(b) Any less than statewide political party or assembly of electors  having nominated candidates
shall pay a fee of $600 to  the Secretary of State when the statement is filed or may submit a petition
in a form prescribed by the secretary containing the signatures of 300 active electors.
(c) The signatures on a petition submitted under this subsection shall be verified by the  county
clerk or the Secretary of State.
(d) The Secretary of State  by rule shall establish procedures for verifying whether a petition
submitted under this subsection contains the required number of signatures of active electors.
(4) A statement of  arguments filed under this section must be filed using [ an] the  electronic
filing system [ designated] adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.014.
(5) The Secretary of State by rule shall prescribe the size  of the statements permitted under this
section, except that  any statewide political party or assembly of electors having nominated candi-
dates shall be allotted more space than  any less than statewide political party or assembly of elec-
tors having nominated candidates.
(6) For  purposes of this section, an “active elector” is a person whose registration is considered
active as described in ORS 247.013.
SECTION 25.  ORS 251.065 is amended to read:
251.065. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, not sooner  than the 120th
day and not later than the 68th day  before the primary election, a candidate or agent on behalf of
the candidate  for nomination or election at the primary election to the office of President or Vice
President of the United States,  United States Senator, Representative in Congress or a state office
as defined in ORS 249.002 may file with the Secretary  of State a portrait of the candidate and a
statement of  the reasons the candidate should be nominated or elected. A candidate or agent on
behalf of  the candidate for nomination or election to a county or city office, or to an elected office
of a metropolitan  service district organized under ORS chapter 268, may file a portrait and state-
ment under this subsection if permitted under ORS 251.067.
(b) A portrait and  statement may be filed not later than the 63rd day before the primary election
in the event of a vacancy described in ORS 249.037 (2).
(2) Not sooner than the 120th day and not later than the 70th day  before the general election,
a candidate or agent on behalf of the candidate for election at the  general election to the office of
President or Vice President of the United States, United States Senator, Representative in Congress
or a state office as defined  in ORS 249.002 may file with the Secretary of State a portrait of the
candidate and a statement of the reasons the candidate should be elected. A candidate  or agent on
behalf of  the candidate for election to a county or city office, or to an elected office of a metropol-
itan service district organized under ORS chapter 268, may file a portrait and statement under this
subsection if permitted under ORS 251.067.
(3) In the case of a special election  to fill a vacancy as described in ORS 251.022, the Secretary
of State by  rule shall set the deadline for filing with the secretary a portrait of the candidate and
a statement of the reasons the candidate should be nominated or elected.
(4) All portraits and statements described in this section must  be filed using [ an] the electronic
filing system [ designated] adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.014.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 9
(5) Subject to the requirements  of this section, the Secretary of State by rule shall establish the
format of the statements permitted under this section.
(6) A portrait or statement filed  under this section must be accompanied by a telephone or
electronic facsimile transmission  machine number where the candidate may be contacted for pur-
poses of ORS 251.087.
SECTION 26.  ORS 251.255 is amended to read:
251.255. (1) Not sooner than the 120th day and not  later than the 70th day before a  general
election or the 68th day before a special election held  on the date of any primary election at which
a state  measure is to be voted upon, any person may file with the Secretary of State an argument
supporting or opposing the measure.
(2)(a) A person filing an argument under this section shall  pay a fee of $1,200 to the Secretary
of State when the argument is filed or may submit a petition in a form prescribed by the Secretary
of State containing the signatures of 500 active electors. Each person  signing the petition shall
subscribe to a statement that the person has read and agrees with the argument.
(b) The signatures on each petition shall be verified by the county clerk or the Secretary  of
State.
(c) The Secretary of  State by rule shall establish procedures for verifying whether a petition
submitted under this subsection contains the required number of signatures of active electors.
(3) An argument filed under this section must be filed using  [ an] the  electronic filing system
[designated] adopted by the Secretary of State under ORS 251.014.
(4) The Secretary of  State by rule shall establish the size and length of arguments permitted
under ORS 251.245 and this section, except that the length of an argument may not  exceed 325
words. The size and length limitations shall be the same  for arguments submitted under ORS 251.245
or this section.
SECTION 27.
 ORS 254.115 is amended to read:
254.115. (1) The official primary election ballot shall be styled  “Official Primary Nominating
Ballot for the  Party.” and shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the primary election.
(c) The names of all candidates for nomination at the primary election  whose nominating pe-
titions or  declarations of candidacy have been made and filed, and who have not died, withdrawn
or become disqualified.
(d) The names of candidates for election as precinct committeeperson.
(e) The names of candidates for the party nomination for  President of the United States who
qualified for the ballot under ORS 249.078.
(2) The primary election ballot may include any city, county or nonpartisan office or the  num-
ber, ballot title and financial estimates under ORS 250.125 of any measure.
(3)(a) The ballot may not  contain the name of any person other than those referred to in sub-
sections (1) and (2) of this section.
(b) The name of each candidate for whom a nominating petition or declaration of candidacy has
been filed shall be printed on the ballot in but one  place , except in circumstances where a can-
didate may hold more than one office or nomination without violating ORS 249.013 .
(c) In the event that two or more candidates for the same nomination or office have the  same
or similar surnames, the location of their places of residence  shall be printed with their names to
distinguish one from another.
SECTION 28.
 ORS 254.135 is amended to read:
254.135. (1) The  official general or special election ballot shall be styled “Official Ballot” and
shall state:
(a) The name of the county for which it is intended.
(b) The date of the election.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 10
(c) The names of all candidates for offices to be filled at the  election whose nominations have
been made and accepted and who have  not died, withdrawn or become disqualified. The ballot may
not contain the name of any other person.
(d) The number,  ballot title and financial estimates under ORS 250.125 of any measure to be
voted on at the election.
(2) The names of candidates for President and Vice  President of the United States shall be
printed in groups together, [ under] with their political party  designations. The names of the electors
may not be printed on the general election ballot. A vote for the candidates for  President and Vice
President is a vote for the group  of presidential electors supporting those candidates and selected
as provided by law. The general election ballot shall state that electors of  President and Vice
President are being elected and that  a vote for the candidates for President and Vice President shall
be a vote for the electors supporting those candidates.
(3)(a) The name of each candidate nominated shall be printed on the  ballot in but one place,
without regard to how many times the candidate may have been nominated , except in circum-
stances where a candidate may hold more than one  office or nomination without violating
ORS 249.013. The name of a political party, or names of political parties,  shall be printed with the
name of a candidate for other than nonpartisan office according to the following rules:
(A) For a candidate  not affiliated with a political party who is nominated by a minor political
party, the name of the minor political party shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(B) For a candidate not affiliated with a political party who is  nominated by more than one
minor political  party, the names of not more than three minor political parties selected by the can-
didate shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(C) For a candidate who is a member of a political party who is nominated by a  political party
of which  the candidate is not a member, the name of the political party that nominated the candi-
date shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(D) For a candidate who is a member of a political party  who is nominated by more than one
political party of which the candidate is not a member, the names of  not more than three political
parties selected by the candidate shall be printed with the name of the candidate;
(E) For a  candidate who is nominated only by a political party of which the candidate is a
member, the name of the political party  of which the candidate is a member shall be printed with
the name of the candidate; and
(F) For a candidate who is nominated by a political party of which the candidate is a member
and by any  political party or parties of which the candidate is not a member, the name of the poli-
tical party of which the candidate is a member and the names of not more than two  other political
parties selected by the candidate shall be printed with the name of the candidate.
(b) If a candidate is required  to select the name of a political party to be printed on the ballot
under paragraph (a) of this subsection, the candidate shall notify the  filing officer of the selection
not later than the 61st day before the day of the election.
(c) The word “incumbent” shall be printed with the name of each candidate  for the Supreme
Court, Court of  Appeals, Oregon Tax Court or circuit court who is designated the incumbent by the
Secretary of State under ORS 254.085.
(d) The word “nonaffiliated” shall  be printed with the name of each candidate who is not affil-
iated with a political party and who is nominated by an assembly of electors or  individual electors.
(e) If two  or more candidates for the same office have the same or similar surnames, the location
of their places of residence shall be printed with their names to distinguish one from another.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection  (3)(a) of this section, the name of a candidate nominated for more
than one district office that is to be filled at the same  election shall be separately printed upon the
ballot for each district office for which the candidate is nominated.
SECTION 29.  ORS 255.085 is amended to read:
255.085. (1) Not later than the 61st day before a district election on a measure,  the district
elections authority shall deliver  to the elections officer a notice stating the date of the election and
a ballot title.  The district elections authority shall prepare the ballot title for a measure referred
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 11
by the  authority with the assistance of the district attorney for the county of the elections officer
or an attorney employed by the district elections  authority.  The district elections authority shall
include the ballot title for the measure at the time the measure is  submitted to the elections
officer.
(2) If a district submits a measure to the electors of the district at an election  held on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November  and the district submitted a measure on the election
date in ORS 255.345 (1) immediately preceding  the date of an election held on the first Tuesday after
the first Monday in November, the district  elections authority shall file the measure , including the
ballot title for the measure,  for the election held on the first Tuesday after  the first Monday in
November with the elections officer not later than the 47th day before an election held  on the first
Tuesday after the first Monday in November.
(3) A notice of election called to approve the issuance of bonds shall include:
(a) The purpose for which the bonds are to be used;
(b) The amount and the term of the bonds;
(c) The kind of bonds proposed to be issued; and
(d) If  the bond election is authorized by ORS 450.900, the additional notice requirements in ORS
450.905.
(4)(a) In  the case of a measure submitted by initiative or referendum petition, the elections of-
ficer shall publish the notice in  the next available edition of a newspaper of general circulation in
the district after the deadline for filing the notice.
(b) In the case of a measure referred by the district elections authority,  the elections officer
shall publish the notice of election in the next available  edition of a newspaper of general circu-
lation in the district after  the notice of election is filed. The notice shall also state that an elector
may file a petition for review of the ballot title not later than the date  referred to in ORS 255.155.
If the circuit  court certifies a different ballot title, the elections officer shall publish an amended
notice of election in the next available edition of the newspaper referred to in  this subsection after
the new title is certified to the elections officer.
(c) In addition to publishing the  notice as described in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this subsection,
the elections officer may publish the notice on the county’s website for a minimum of seven days.
SECTION 30.
 ORS 255.295 is amended to read:
255.295. (1) Not later than the 20th day after the  date of an election, the [ county clerk ] elections
officer shall prepare an abstract of the votes and deliver it  to the district elections authority. Not
later than the 40th day after [ receiving the abstract ] the date  of an election , the district elections
authority shall determine from it the result of the election.
(2) Subject  to ORS 254.548, the [ county clerk ] elections officer  may issue a certificate of
election only after the district elections authority has notified the  [ county clerk ] elections officer
in writing of the result of the election. The notification to the [ county clerk ] elections officer  shall
contain a statement indicating whether any candidate elected to district  office is qualified to hold
the office.
SECTION 31.  ORS 254.565 is amended to read:
254.565. Subject to ORS 254.548, the chief city elections officer:
(1) After the primary election, shall enter in a register of nominations:
(a) The name of each candidate for city office nominated at the primary election.
(b) The office for which the candidate is nominated.
(c) If applicable, the name of the major political party nominating the candidate.
(d) The date of the entry.
(2) After the general election,  shall prepare and deliver a certificate of election to each qualified
candidate having the most votes for election to a city office.
(3) Not later than the [ 30th] 40th  day after any election, shall canvass the vote on each city
measure, and if two or more of the approved measures contain conflicting provisions, proclaim which
is paramount.
NOTE:
 Section 32 was deleted by amendment. Subsequent sections were not renumbered.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 12
SECTION 33.  ORS 260.043 is amended to read:
260.043. (1) A candidate who serves  as the candidate’s own treasurer and who expects neither
the aggregate contributions to be received nor the aggregate expenditures to be made  by or on be-
half of the candidate to exceed $750 in total amount during a calendar year is not required to:
(a) File a statement of organization under ORS 260.039;
(b) Establish a single exclusive campaign account under ORS 260.054; or
(c) File statements under ORS 260.057.
(2) A candidate described in subsection (1) of this section must keep contribution and expendi-
ture records for the previous 24 months.
[(3) If at any time following the filing of a nominating petition,  declaration of candidacy or certif-
icate of nomination and during the calendar year either the aggregate contributions  or aggregate ex-
penditures exceed $750, the candidate shall do all of the following: ]
[(a) File a statement of organization under ORS 260.039. ]
[(b) Establish a single exclusive campaign account as required under ORS 260.054. ]
[(c) File a statement under ORS 260.057 showing  all contributions received and expenditures made.
The statement shall be  filed not later than seven calendar days after aggregate contributions or ag-
gregate expenditures exceed $750 during a calendar year. ]
[(d) If necessary, file additional statements under ORS 260.057. ]
(3)(a) If at any time during the calendar year  either the aggregate contributions or ag-
gregate expenditures exceed $750, the candidate must file a statement of organization  under
ORS 260.039, establish a single exclusive campaign  account as required under ORS 260.054
and file statements as required in paragraph (b) of this subsection.
(b)(A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B)  of this paragraph, if at any time during
the calendar year either the aggregate  contributions or aggregate expenditures exceed $750,
the candidate must file a statement under ORS 260.057 showing all contributions received and
expenditures made.  After aggregate contributions or aggregate expenditures exceed $750
during a calendar year, the statement shall be filed under  the time frames established in
ORS 260.057 (3).
(B) If the candidate expects neither the aggregate contributions to be received nor the
aggregate expenditures to  be made by or on behalf of the candidate to exceed $3,500 during
the calendar year, the candidate may file a statement  to that effect under ORS 260.112,
rather than file statements under ORS 260.057. Notwithstanding ORS 260.112 (2), the state-
ment shall be filed  not later than seven calendar days after aggregate contributions or ag-
gregate expenditures exceed $750 during a calendar year.
(4) This section does not apply to candidates for federal office.
SECTION 34.
 ORS 260.054 is amended to read:
260.054. (1) Each  political committee shall establish a single exclusive campaign account and
each petition committee organized under ORS 260.118 shall establish  a single exclusive petition ac-
count in a financial institution, as defined in ORS 706.008. The  financial institution must be located
in this state and must ordinarily conduct business with the general public in this state.
(2) A political committee shall  maintain the campaign account in the name of the political
committee. A petition committee shall  maintain the petition account in the name of the petition
committee.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section:
(a) All expenditures made by the political committee  shall be drawn from the campaign account
and:
(A) Issued on a check signed by the candidate on whose behalf the account  is established, by
the treasurer of the political committee or by an individual designated by the candidate or treasurer;
or
(B) Paid using a debit card or other form of electronic transaction.
(b) All expenditures made  by the petition committee shall be drawn from the petition account
and:
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 13
(A) Issued on a check signed by the chief petitioner  or treasurer of the petition committee or
by an individual designated by the chief petitioner or treasurer; or
(B) Paid using a debit card or other form of electronic transaction.
(4) Subsection (3) of this section does not prohibit a person from  making a cash or other ex-
penditure on behalf of the political committee or petition  committee and receiving reimbursement
from the campaign or petition account.
(5)(a) Not later than seven [ calendar] business days after the date the contribution is  received:
(A) A contribution received by a  candidate or the treasurer of a political committee, directly
or indirectly, shall be deposited into the campaign account.
(B) A contribution received by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition  committee, directly
or indirectly, shall be deposited into the petition account.
(b) This subsection does not apply to in-kind contributions received  by a candidate, political
committee or petition committee.
(6) This section does not prohibit the transfer  of any amount deposited in a campaign or petition
account into a certificate of deposit, stock fund or other investment instrument.
(7) A campaign or petition account may not include  any private moneys, other than contrib-
utions received by the political committee or petition committee.
(8) A political committee or petition committee  shall retain a copy of each financial institution
account statement from the campaign or petition account described  in this section for not less than
two years after the date the statement is issued by the financial institution.
(9) This section does not apply to candidates described in ORS 260.043.
(10) As used  in this section, “contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or ex-
penditure to or on behalf of an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
SECTION 35.
 ORS 260.055 is amended to read:
260.055. (1) Each candidate, other than a candidate for political  party office, the treasurer of
each political committee and the treasurer of each petition committee shall keep detailed accounts.
The accounts shall be current as of not later than the seventh [ calendar] business day after the date
of receiving a contribution or making an expenditure with respect to  all contributions received and
all expenditures  made by or on behalf of the candidate or committee that are required to be reported
under ORS 260.057, 260.076 or 260.078. Subject to ORS 260.085, the accounts shall list all information
required to be reported under ORS 260.083.
(2) Accounts kept by a candidate or the treasurer of a political committee may  be inspected
under reasonable circumstances at any time before the election to which the  accounts refer or
during the period specified for retention of the accounts under subsection (3) of this section  by any
opposing candidate or the treasurer of any political committee for the same electoral  contest. The
right of inspection may  be enforced by writ of mandamus issued by any court of competent juris-
diction. The treasurers of political committees supporting a candidate may be joined with  the can-
didate as defendants in a mandamus proceeding.
(3) Accounts kept by a  candidate or treasurer shall be preserved by the candidate or treasurer
for at least two years after the date the statement of the contribution or expenditure is filed  under
ORS 260.057.
SECTION 36.
 ORS 260.057 is amended to read:
260.057. (1) The Secretary of State by rule  shall adopt an electronic filing system to be used by:
(a) All candidates and political committees to file with the secretary  statements of contributions
received and expenditures made by the candidates and political committees, as described in  ORS
260.083.
(b) Treasurers of  petition committees organized under ORS 260.118 to file with the secretary
statements of contributions received and expenditures made by the treasurers  or chief petitioners
as described in ORS 260.083.
(c) Persons who make independent expenditures as provided in ORS 260.044 to file with the
secretary statements of independent expenditures made by the  persons as described in ORS 260.083.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 14
(2) Except as otherwise provided in  this section, a candidate or political committee shall file a
statement of contributions received and expenditures made described in  subsection (1)(a) of this
section not later than 30 calendar days after a contribution is received or an expenditure is made.
(3)(a) A candidate for nomination or election at  any primary or general election or a political
committee supporting or opposing a  candidate or measure at any primary or general election shall
file a statement described  in subsection (1)(a) of this section not later than seven calendar days after
a contribution is received or an expenditure is made. This paragraph applies  to contributions re-
ceived and expenditures made:
(A) During the period beginning  on the 42nd calendar day before the date of any primary
election and ending on the date of the primary election; and
(B) During the period beginning  on the 42nd calendar day before the date of any general
election and ending on the date of the general election.
(b) For any special election, the secretary by rule may  establish a period during which a can-
didate for nomination or election at the special election or a political committee supporting  or op-
posing a candidate or measure at the special election must file a statement described  in subsection
(1) of this section not later than seven calendar days after a contribution is received or an expend-
iture is made.
(c) If the candidate or political committee receives a  contribution or makes an expenditure prior
to the 42nd calendar day before the date of the primary or general election and the  candidate or
political committee has not filed a statement of the contribution or expenditure under subsection (2)
of this section by the 43rd calendar  day before the date of the primary or general election, the
candidate or political committee shall file a statement described in subsection  (1)(a) of this section
not later than the 35th calendar day before the date of the primary or general election.
(4) The electronic filing system shall be provided free of charge by the secretary and shall:
(a) Accept electronic files that conform to the format prescribed by the secretary by rule; or
(b) Be compatible with any other  electronic filing application provided or approved by the sec-
retary.
(5)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, the secretary shall make all  data
filed electronically under subsection (1)(a) of  this section and all information filed with the secretary
under ORS 260.049 or 260.085 available on the  Internet to the public free of charge according to a
schedule adopted by the secretary  by rule. The secretary shall make the data available in a
searchable  database  that is easily accessible by the public. When the secretary makes data or in-
formation available on the Internet under this subsection, the secretary shall display any contrib-
ution received from a person or political committee with an out-of-state address in a  different
colored font than a contribution received from a person or political committee  with an in-state ad-
dress.
(b) The secretary may not make data that are filed  electronically under subsection (1)(a) of this
section available to the public under this section, unless the data are required to be  listed under
ORS 260.083. The secretary may not disclose under ORS 192.410 to 192.505 any data that are filed
electronically under subsection (1)(a) of this section, unless the  data are required to be listed under
ORS 260.083.
(6)[(a)] [ Except as provided in paragraph (b) of  this subsection, ] Each statement required by this
section shall be signed and certified as true by the candidate [ or treasurer  required to file it ],
treasurer, designee of the candidate or  treasurer or person who files a statement of inde-
pendent expenditures under  ORS 260.044, as appropriate . Signatures shall be supplied in the
manner specified by the secretary by rule.
[(b) A candidate or treasurer  may designate an individual to sign and certify as true a statement
required by this section. The designation must be filed  in writing with the secretary and must be re-
newed for each two-year period beginning January 1 of an even-numbered year. ]
(7) This section does not apply to:
(a) Candidates for federal office;
(b) Candidates who are not required to file a statement of organization under ORS 260.043; or
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 15
(c) Candidates, political committees or petition committees that file  certificates under ORS
260.112.
SECTION 37.  ORS 260.078 is amended to read:
260.078. If the  first statement filed by a candidate, a candidate’s principal campaign committee ,
a petition committee  or a political  committee under ORS 260.057 shows an unexpended balance
of contributions not previously reported  on hand, the statement shall list all contributions and ex-
penditures giving rise to the unexpended balance of contributions in accordance with ORS 260.083.
SECTION 38.  ORS 260.232 is amended to read:
260.232. (1) The Secretary of  State may impose a civil penalty as provided in this section, in
addition to any other penalty that may be imposed, for:
(a) Failure to file a statement  or certificate required to be filed under ORS 260.044, 260.057,
260.076, 260.078, 260.083, 260.112 or 260.118.
(b) Failure to include in a statement filed under ORS 260.044,  260.057, 260.076, 260.078, 260.083,
260.112 or 260.118 the information required under ORS 260.044, 260.057, 260.076, 260.083 or 260.118.
(2)(a) If a  person required to file has not filed a statement or certificate complying with appli-
cable provisions of ORS 260.044, 260.057,  260.076, 260.078, 260.083, 260.085, 260.112 or 260.118 within
the time specified in ORS 260.044, 260.057, 260.076, 260.078 or 260.118, the  Secretary of State by first
class mail  or electronically  shall notify the person that a penalty may be imposed and that  the
person has 20 days from the service date on the notice to request a  hearing before the Secretary
of State.
(b) If the person required to file is a candidate or  the principal campaign committee of a can-
didate, the Secretary of State shall send the notice described in paragraph (a) of this subsection by
first class mail  or electronically  to the  candidate. The notice shall be used for purposes of deter-
mining the deadline for requesting a hearing under subsection (3) of this section.
(3) A hearing on whether to impose a civil penalty and to consider circumstances in  mitigation
shall be held by the Secretary of State:
(a) Upon request of the person against  whom the penalty may be assessed, if the request is made
not later than the 20th day [ after the person received ] from the service  date on  the notice sent
under subsection (2) of this section;
(b) Upon request of the filing officer with whom a  statement or certificate was required to be
filed but was not filed; or
(c) Upon the Secretary of State’s own motion.
(4) A hearing under subsection  (3) of this section shall be held not later than 45 days after the
deadline for the person against whom the penalty may be assessed to request a  hearing. However,
if requested by the person against whom the  penalty may be assessed, a hearing under subsection
(3) of  this section shall be held not later than 60 days after the deadline for the person against whom
the penalty may be assessed to request a hearing.
(5) The Secretary of State shall issue an order not later than 90  days after a hearing or after
the deadline for requesting a hearing if no hearing is held.
(6) The person against whom a penalty may be assessed  need not appear in person at a hearing
held under this section, but instead may submit written testimony and other  evidence, subject to the
penalty for  false swearing, to the Secretary of State for entry in the hearing record. The testimony
and other evidence must be received by the secretary not later than three business  days before the
day of the hearing and may be submitted electronically.
(7) A civil penalty imposed under this section may not be more than the following:
(a) For failure to file a statement or certificate required to be filed  under ORS 260.044, 260.057,
260.076, 260.078, 260.083, 260.112 or 260.118, 10 percent of the total amount of the contribution or
expenditure required to be included in the statement or certificate; or
(b) For each failure to include in a statement filed under  ORS 260.044, 260.057, 260.076, 260.078,
260.083, 260.112 or 260.118 the information  required under ORS 260.044, 260.057, 260.076, 260.083 or
260.118, 10 percent of the total amount of  the contribution or expenditure required to be included
in the statement.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 16
(8) The Secretary of State, upon a showing  of mitigating circumstances, may reduce the amount
of the penalty described in subsection (7) of this section.
(9) Except as otherwise provided by this section, civil penalties under this section shall be  im-
posed as provided in ORS 183.745.
SECTION 39.  ORS 260.241 is amended to read:
260.241. (1) Despite delay in the filing of  statements relating to a candidate’s nomination re-
quired to be filed under ORS 260.057,  or in the filing of a certificate described in ORS 260.112 in lieu
of a statement required under ORS 260.057, prior to the nominating election, the candidate’s name
shall appear  on the general election ballot if those statements or the certificate is filed before the
61st day before the general election.
(2) A candidate’s name may not be placed on the  general election ballot if the statements or
certificate referred to in  subsection (1) of this section is not filed before the 61st day before the
general election.
(3) If the statements  or certificate referred to in subsection (1) of this section is not filed by the
68th day before the general  election, the filing officer by mail  or electronically  shall notify the
candidate  that  the candidate’s name may not be placed on the general election ballot. The filing
officer shall send the notice described in  this subsection by first class mail  or electronically  to the
candidate and the candidate’s  treasurer or the treasurer of the candidate’s principal campaign
committee. The filing officer is not required to  send two notices if the candidate serves as the
treasurer of the candidate’s principal campaign committee.
SECTION 40.
 ORS 260.407 is amended to read:
260.407. (1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this  subsection, amounts received as con-
tributions by a candidate , [or] the principal campaign committee of a candidate  [for public office that
are in excess of any amount necessary to defray  expenditures and any other funds donated to a holder
of public office ] or the principal campaign committee of a holder of public office  may be:
(A) Used to defray any  expenses incurred in connection with the recipient’s duties as a holder
of public office;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the  Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a candidate , [ or] the principal campaign committee of
a candidate for public office [ that are in excess of any amount necessary to  defray expenditures and
other funds donated to a holder of public office ] or the principal campaign  committee of a holder
of public office may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal  use other than to defray any expenses incurred in
connection with the person’s duties as a holder of public office or to repay to a  candidate any loan
the proceeds of which were used in connection with the candidate’s campaign;
(B) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part  of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this paragraph may be used to pay a civil penalty  imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
(C) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal  expenses incurred by the
candidate or public official in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or investigation  that re-
lates to or arises from the  course and scope of the duties of the person as a candidate or public
official. Contributions described in this paragraph may be used to pay legal  expenses incurred by
the candidate or public official in connection with a legal proceeding brought  under [ this chapter ]
ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under this section or ORS 260.409.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a political committee that is  not a principal campaign committee [ that are in excess of any amount
necessary to defray expenditures ] may be:
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 17
(A) Used to repay to the political committee any loan the  proceeds of which were used in con-
nection with the campaign;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any organization described in section 170(c) of the  Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by the political committee may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in this subparagraph, used to pay any money award  as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil  penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS  183.310 or by a local government as defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
(C) Except as provided in this  subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a
treasurer or director of  a political committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding or in-
vestigation that relates to or arises from  the course and scope of the duties of the person as a
treasurer or director. Contributions described  in this subsection may be used to pay legal expenses
incurred by a  treasurer or director in connection with a legal proceeding brought under [ this
chapter] ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under  this section or ORS
260.409.
(3)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, amounts received as contributions
by a chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee [ that are in excess of any amount necessary
to defray expenditures ] may be:
(A) Used to repay to the chief petitioner any loan the proceeds of  which were used in con-
nection with the initiative, referendum or recall petition;
(B) Transferred to any national, state or local political committee of any political party;
(C) Contributed to any  organization described in section 170(c) of the Internal Revenue Code
or to any charitable corporation as defined in ORS 128.620; or
(D) Used for any other lawful purpose.
(b) Amounts received as contributions by a  chief petitioner or treasurer of a petition committee
may not be:
(A) Converted by any person to any personal use;
(B) Except as provided in  this subparagraph, used to pay any money award as defined in ORS
18.005 included as part  of a judgment in a civil or criminal action or any civil penalty imposed by
an agency as defined in ORS 183.310 or by a local government as  defined in ORS 174.116. Contrib-
utions described in this subsection may be used to pay a civil penalty imposed under this chapter,
other than a civil penalty imposed for a violation of this section or ORS 260.409; or
(C) Except as provided  in this subparagraph, used to pay any legal expenses incurred by a chief
petitioner or the treasurer  of a petition committee in any civil, criminal or other legal proceeding
or investigation that relates to or arises from the course and scope of  the duties of the person as
a chief petitioner or treasurer.  Contributions described in this subsection may be used to pay legal
expenses incurred by a chief petitioner  or treasurer in connection with a legal proceeding brought
under [ this chapter ] ORS chapters 246 to 260 , other than a proceeding brought under this  section
or ORS 260.409.
(4) As used in this section:
(a) “Contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution or expenditure to or on  behalf of
an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
(b) “Funds donated” means all  funds, including but not limited to gifts, loans, advances, credits
or deposits of money that are  donated for the purpose of supporting the activities of a holder of
public office. “Funds donated” does not mean  funds appropriated by the Legislative Assembly or
another similar public appropriating body or  personal funds of the office holder donated to an ac-
count containing only those personal funds.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 18
(c) “Public office” does not include national or political party office.
SECTION 41.
 ORS 260.715 is amended to read:
260.715. (1) A person may not knowingly make a  false statement, oath or affidavit when a
statement, oath or affidavit is required under the election laws.
(2) A person may not request a ballot in a name other than the person’s own name.
(3) A person may not vote or attempt to vote more than once at any election held on the  same
date.
(4) A person may  not vote or attempt to vote both in an election held in this state and in an-
other state on the same date.
(5) A person, except an elections official in performance of duties, may not willfully  alter or
destroy a ballot cast at an election or the returns of an election.
(6) A person may not willfully place a fraudulent ballot among the genuine ballots.
(7) A person may not  falsely write anything purporting to be written by an elections official in
performance of duties on the ballot.
(8) A person may not commit theft of a ballot  or tally or return sheet, or willfully hinder or
delay the delivery of the tally or return sheet to the county clerk, or fraudulently break open  a
sealed tally or return sheet of the election.
(9)(a) A person may not :
(A) Manufacture or knowingly use a fraudulent ballot return identification envelope  or secrecy
envelope ; or
(B) Sell, make an  offer with the actual intent  to sell, purchase or make an  offer with the
actual intent  to purchase, for money or other valuable consideration, any official ballot, replace-
ment ballot, ballot return identification envelope or secrecy envelope.
(b) As used in this subsection, “ballot return  identification envelope” and “secrecy envelope”
mean those envelopes used to return ballots to the county clerk.
SECTION 42.
 ORS 254.529 is amended to read:
254.529. (1) At each general election,  the county clerk shall conduct a hand count of ballots as
described in this section and compare the tally of votes for those ballots produced  by a vote tally
system with the tally of votes for those ballots produced by the hand count.
(2)(a) In the event that the unofficial tally of ballots produced by a vote tally system reveals that
the margin of victory between the two candidates receiving the largest  number of votes in the
county is less than one percent of the total votes cast in that  election in the county, the county
clerk shall conduct a hand count of ballots in at least 10 percent of all precincts or of  ballots in
at least 10 percent of all batches of ballots collected by the county clerk.
(b) In the event  that the unofficial tally of ballots reveals that the margin of victory between
the two candidates receiving the largest number of votes in  the county is greater than or equal to
one percent but less than  two percent of the total votes cast in the county, the county clerk shall
conduct a hand count of ballots in at least five percent of all precincts or  of ballots in at least five
percent of all batches of ballots collected by the county clerk.
(c) In the event that the unofficial tally of ballots reveals that the margin of  victory between
the two candidates receiving the largest number of votes  in the county is greater than or equal to
two percent of the total votes cast in the county, the county clerk shall  conduct a hand count of
ballots in at least three percent of  all precincts or of ballots in at least three percent of all batches
of ballots collected by the county clerk.
(3) The county clerk  shall conduct a hand count of ballots cast in the election contest
between the two candidates receiving the largest number of votes in the county, an  election
contest for an office to be voted on in the state at large and, if possible, an election contest
for a state measure.  The  Secretary of State shall select the precincts or batches  at random. At
the general election[ ,]:
(a) If selecting precincts,  no fewer than 150 ballots must have been cast in at least one of the
precincts  selected .
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 19
(b) If selecting batches, the number of ballots contained in  the batches selected must in
the aggregate be equal to or greater than:
(A) Ten  percent of the total number of ballots cast in the election for a hand count re-
quired under subsection (2)(a) of this section.
(B) Five percent of the total number  of ballots cast in the election for a hand count re-
quired under subsection (2)(b) of this section.
(C) Three percent of the total number of ballots cast in the election for a  hand count
required under subsection (2)(c)  of this section . [ The county clerk shall conduct a hand count of
ballots cast in  the election contest between the two candidates receiving the largest number of votes in
the county, an election contest  for an office to be voted on in the state at large and, if possible, an
election contest for a state measure. ]
(4) Not later than 5 p.m.  of the [ third] 15th business day after the date of the general election,
the Secretary of State shall advise county clerks in writing of:
(a) The election contests for which ballots are to be hand counted; and
(b) The precincts or batches  in which ballots are to be hand counted.
(5) A county clerk shall begin the hand counts prescribed by this section not later than the
[21st] 23rd day after the election and complete the hand counts not  later than the 30th day after the
election. The results of the hand  counts shall be provided to the Secretary of State, who shall make
the results publicly available on the Secretary of State’s website.
(6) A comparison of the tally of votes produced by a vote tally  system with the tally of votes
produced by the hand count required by this section must show that the tally of votes produced by
the vote tally system differs by no more than one-half of one percent  from the tally of votes
produced by the hand count.
(7)(a) If a hand count conducted under this section results in a tally  of votes for a candidate or
measure that is different from the tally of  votes produced by the vote tally system for that candidate
or measure, and  the difference for each race is equal to or less than one-half of one percent, the
tally of votes produced by the vote tally system is the official tally of votes  for that vote tally sys-
tem.
(b) If a hand count conducted under this section results in a tally  of votes for a candidate or
measure that is different from the tally of  votes produced by the vote tally system for that candidate
or measure, and the difference in any race is greater than  one-half of one percent, the county clerk
shall conduct a second hand count of the same ballots.
(c) If the second hand count conducted under this subsection results in a  tally of votes for a
candidate  or  measure that is different from the tally of votes produced by the vote tally system for
that candidate or measure, and the difference for each race is equal to or less than one-half  of one
percent, the tally of votes produced by the vote tally system is the official tally of votes for that
vote tally system.
(d) If the second hand count conducted under this subsection results in a tally  of votes for a
candidate  or  measure that is different from the tally of votes produced by the vote tally system for
that candidate or measure, and the difference in  any race is greater than one-half of one percent,
the county clerk shall conduct a hand count of all ballots counted by that vote tally  system. The
hand count is the official tally of votes for that vote tally system. If the hand count is the official
tally of votes, not later than the 30th day after the election, the  county clerk shall certify amended
abstracts of votes to appropriate elections officials.
(8) For purposes of conducting the hand counts required under this  section, the county clerk
shall:
(a) Retain custody of the ballots; and
(b) Provide for security for the ballots and the information required to be collected  under this
subsection.
(9) This section does not apply:
(a) To precincts that are subject to a recount under ORS 258.161, 258.280 or 258.290.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 20
(b) If federal law requires a post-election hand count of ballots at the  general election to verify
election results and the Secretary of State determines that the  requirements of federal law are at
least as stringent as the requirements of subsections (1) to (8) of this section.
SECTION 43.  ORS 249.008 is amended to read:
249.008. (1) Except as provided in subsection (2) of  this section, before a nominating petition,
minutes of an assembly of electors[ ,] or petition by individual electors is offered for filing, the county
clerk of each county in  which the signatures were secured or the Secretary of State  shall compare
the signatures of electors on the petition or minutes with the signatures of the  electors on the
elector registration cards. Any petition or  minutes submitted for verification under this section shall
contain only original signatures.  The county clerk or the secretary  shall attach to the petition or
minutes a certificate stating the number of signatures believed to be genuine. The certificate  is
prima facie evidence of the facts stated in it. A signature not included in the  number certified to
be genuine shall not be counted by the officer with whom the petition is filed.  No signature in vio-
lation of the provisions of this chapter shall be counted.
(2) If the total number of signatures presented to  a county clerk or the Secretary of State  for
verification is 15,000 or more, the county clerk or secretary  may use a  statistical sampling tech-
nique authorized by the secretary [ of State] to verify the  signatures. The sample shall be drawn from
at least 100 percent of the number of signatures required for nomination.
(3) After signatures of electors on a nominating  petition, minutes of an assembly of electors or
petition by individual electors are submitted for verification, no elector who signed the  petition or
minutes may remove the signature of the elector from the petition or minutes.
(4) The Secretary of State by rule  shall establish procedures for verifying whether a pe-
tition submitted under this section contains the required number of signatures of electors.
SECTION 44.  ORS 249.064 is amended to read:
249.064. (1) A  nominating petition of a candidate seeking the nomination of a major political
party shall contain  a statement that each elector whose signature appears on the petition is a
member of the same major political party as is the candidate.
(2) A nominating petition of any candidate  shall contain the number of signatures of electors
required by ORS 249.068 or 249.072 and the residence or mailing address  and name or number of the
precinct, if known, of each elector whose signature appears.
(3) Pursuant  to ORS 249.008, the county clerks or the Secretary of State  shall certify the
signatures contained in the nominating petition for genuineness.
SECTION 45.  ORS 249.078 is amended to read:
249.078. (1) The name of a candidate for a major political party nomination for President  of the
United States shall be printed on the ballot only:
(a) By  direction of the Secretary of State who in the secretary’s sole discretion has determined
that the candidate’s candidacy is generally advocated or is recognized in national news media; or
(b) By nominating petition described in this section and filed with the Secretary of State.
(2) A petition  nominating a candidate under this section shall contain from each congressional
district the signatures of at least  1,000 electors who are registered in the district and who are
members of the major political party of the candidate. The electors in each congressional  district
shall include electors registered in at least five percent of the precincts in each of at least  one-
fourth of the counties in the congressional district. The petition shall contain the printed name,
residence or mailing address and name or number of the precinct, if known, of  each elector whose
signature appears on  the petition. The signatures shall be certified for genuineness by the county
clerks or the Secretary of State  under ORS 249.008.
(3) Before  circulating the nominating petition, the chief sponsor shall file with the Secretary of
State a signed copy  of the prospective petition. The chief sponsor shall include with the prospective
petition a statement declaring whether one  or more persons will be paid money or other valuable
consideration for obtaining signatures of electors on the  petition. After the prospective petition is
filed, the chief sponsor shall notify the Secretary of State not later than the 10th day after the  chief
sponsor first has knowledge or should have had knowledge that:
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 21
(a) Any person is being paid  for obtaining signatures, when the statement included with the
prospective petition declared that no such person would be paid.
(b) No person is being paid for obtaining signatures, when the statement included  with the
prospective petition declared that one or more such persons would be paid.
SECTION 46.  ORS 249.735 is amended to read:
249.735. (1) An assembly of electors is an organized body:
(a) Of not fewer than 1,000 electors of the state for a statewide nomination.
(b) Of not fewer than 500 electors of the congressional district for which the nomination  for
Representative in Congress is made.
(c) Of not  fewer than 250 electors of the county or any other district for which the nomination
is made.
(2) An assembly of electors may nominate candidates at a nominating convention. The  conven-
tion shall be held in one day and last not longer than 12 hours. The signature, printed  name and
residence or mailing address  of each member of the assembly shall be recorded at the convention
and entered of record in the minutes by the secretary of the assembly.  Not less than the minimum
number of electors  required to constitute an assembly of electors must have recorded their signa-
tures in the minutes of the assembly and must be present when the assembly nominates  a candidate.
The candidate receiving the highest number of votes of the assembly for the office shall be  the
nominee of the assembly.
(3) Not later  than the 10th day before the meeting of an assembly of electors, notice shall be
published at  least once in not less than three newspapers of general circulation within the electoral
district for which the nomination will  be made. The notice shall contain the time and place the as-
sembly will meet, the office or offices for which nominations will  be made, and the names and ad-
dresses of not fewer than 25 electors qualified to vote in the assembly who desire that it be held.
(4) Proof of publication of  notice in subsection (3) of this section shall be made by affidavit of
the owner,  editor, publisher, manager, advertising manager, principal clerk of any of them, or the
printer or printer’s foreman of the newspaper in which the  notice is published. The affidavit shall
show publication and shall be filed with the filing officer with the certificate of nomination.
(5) Not  later than the 10th day before the meeting of an assembly of electors, a copy of the
notice under subsection (3) of this section shall be delivered to the filing officer who will supervise
the conduct of the nominating convention.
(6) The presiding officer of an assembly of electors  shall deliver the signatures of assembly
members entered in the minutes to the  appropriate county clerks of the counties in which the as-
sembly members live  or to the Secretary of State if the Secretary of State is  designated as the
filing officer under ORS 249.035 . The signatures shall  be certified by the appropriate county clerk
or by the Secretary of State  under ORS  249.008. A copy of the minutes, certified by the secretary
of the assembly, and the certificate  of the county clerk or the Secretary of State  shall be filed
[with the filing officer ] with the certificate of nomination.
(7) If the assembly of electors designates a committee to whom the assembly delegated the au-
thority to fill vacancies as provided in  ORS 249.842, a notice containing the names of the members
of the committee shall be delivered to the filing officer with the certificate of nomination.
SECTION 47.
 ORS 249.740 is amended to read:
249.740. (1) A certificate of nomination made by individual electors shall contain a  number of
signatures of electors in the electoral district equal to not  less than one percent of the total votes
cast in the electoral district for which the nomination  is intended to be made, for all candidates for
presidential electors at the last general election.
(2) Each elector signing a certificate of nomination made  by individual electors shall include the
residence or mailing address of the elector. Except for a certificate of nomination of candidates for
electors of President and Vice President of the United States, a certificate of  nomination made by
individual electors shall contain the name of only one candidate.
(3) Before  beginning to circulate the certificate of nomination, the chief sponsor of the certif-
icate shall file a signed copy of the prospective certificate  with the filing officer referred to in ORS
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 22
249.722. The chief sponsor of the certificate shall include with the  prospective certificate a state-
ment declaring whether one  or more persons will be paid money or other valuable consideration for
obtaining signatures of electors on the certificate. After the prospective certificate is  filed, the chief
sponsor  shall  notify the filing officer not later than the 10th day after the chief sponsor first has
knowledge or should have had knowledge that:
(a) Any person is being paid  for obtaining signatures, when the statement included with the
prospective certificate declared that no such person would be paid.
(b) No person is being paid for obtaining signatures, when the statement included  with the
prospective certificate declared that one or more such persons would be paid.
(4) The circulator shall certify on each signature sheet that the circulator:
(a) Witnessed the signing of the signature sheet by each individual whose signature appears  on
the signature sheet; and
(b) Believes each individual is an elector registered in the electoral district.
(5) The signatures contained in each certificate of nomination made by individual  electors shall
be certified for genuineness by the county clerk or the Secretary of State  under ORS 249.008.
(6) As used in this  section, “prospective certificate” means the information, except signatures
and other identification of  certificate signers, required to be contained in a completed certificate
of nomination.
SECTION 48.
 ORS 249.005 is amended to read:
249.005. (1) Notwithstanding ORS  249.008 and 249.875, a petition or minutes for which original
signatures are otherwise required may be accepted by the county clerk or the Secretary  of State
for signature verification, or by another  filing officer in the case of a recall petition, with photo-
graphic copies of one or more signature sheets if:
(a) The signature sheets containing the original signatures were  stolen or destroyed by fire, a
natural disaster or other act of God; and
(b) The photographic copy of each original signature  sheet contains the number of the original
signature sheet prescribed by the Secretary of State under ORS 249.009.
(2) As  used in this section, “act of God” means an unanticipated grave natural disaster or other
natural phenomenon of an exceptional, inevitable and irresistible character, the effects of which
could not have been prevented or avoided by the exercise of due care or foresight.
SECTION 49.
 ORS 254.431 is amended to read:
254.431. (1) If a ballot is challenged because it is returned in an unsigned return  identification
envelope or because the signature of an elector on a return identification  envelope does not match
the signature in the voter registration record  for the elector, the county clerk shall mail to the
elector a notice that describes the nature of the challenge. The Secretary of  State shall design a
standard form to be used in all notifications sent by county clerks under this subsection.
(2)(a) In order for the vote of the elector to be  counted, the elector must provide evidence suf-
ficient to disprove the challenge not later than the 14th calendar  day after the date of the election.
In the case of an unsigned return identification envelope, providing sufficient evidence  may
include completing a  certified statement on a form provided by the county clerk. The Sec-
retary of State shall design a standard form to be used for certified statements  made under
this paragraph.
(b) If the elector does not provide evidence sufficient to disprove a challenge alleging  that the
signature of the elector on a  return identification envelope does not match the signature in the
voter registration record for the elector by the 14th calendar  day after the date of the election, the
registration of the elector shall be considered inactive.
(3)(a) The filing officer may not  release as a public record any information that could be used
to identify an elector whose ballot has been challenged under this section  until the eighth calendar
day after the date of an election.
(b) Following the  seventh calendar day after the date of an election, the filing officer may dis-
close  as  a public record under ORS 192.410 to 192.505 the following information about each elector
whose ballot was challenged under this section:
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 23
(A) The name of the elector;
(B) The residence addresses of the elector; and
(C) The reason the elector’s ballot is being challenged.
(4) As used in this section, “filing officer” means:
(a) The Secretary of State, for federal or statewide elections and for  elections to the office of
state Senator or Representative; or
(b) The county clerk, for county, city or district elections.
SECTION 50.
 ORS 254.470 is amended to read:
254.470. (1) The Secretary of State  by rule shall establish requirements and criteria for the
designation of places of deposit for the ballots cast in an election. The rules shall also specify  the
dates and times the places of deposit must be open  and the security requirements for the places of
deposit. At a minimum, the places  designated under this section shall be open on the date of the
election for a period of eight or more hours, but must be open until  at least 8 p.m. At each place
of deposit designated under this section, the county clerk shall prominently display a  sign stating
that the location is an official ballot drop site.
(2)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of  this subsection, the county clerk shall mail
by nonforwardable mail an official ballot with a return identification envelope and a secrecy  envel-
ope not sooner than the 20th day before the date of  an election and not later than the 14th day
before the date of the election, to each  active elector of the electoral district as of the 21st day
before the date of the election.
(b) If the county clerk determines that an active elector of the electoral  district as of the 21st
day before the date of the election does not receive daily mail service from the  United States Postal
Service, the county clerk shall mail by nonforwardable  mail an official ballot with a return iden-
tification envelope and a secrecy envelope to the elector not sooner than the  20th day before the
date of an election and not later than the 18th day before the date of the election.
(c) In  the case of ballots to be mailed to addresses outside this state to electors who are not
military or overseas electors, the county clerk may mail the ballots not sooner  than the 29th day
before the date of the election.
(3) For an election held on the date of a primary election:
(a) The county clerk shall mail the official ballot of a major political  party to each elector who
is registered as being affiliated with the major political  party as of the 21st day before the date of
the election.
(b) The county clerk shall mail  the official ballot of a major political party to an elector not
affiliated with any  political party if the elector has applied for the ballot as provided in this sub-
section and that party has provided under ORS 254.365 for a primary election  that admits electors
not affiliated with any political party.
(c) An elector not affiliated with any political party who wishes to  vote in the primary election
of a major political party  shall apply to the county clerk in writing. The application shall indicate
which major  political party ballot the elector wishes to receive. Except for electors described in
subsection (4) of this section, and subject to ORS 247.203, the application must  be received by the
county clerk not later than 5 p.m. of the 21st day before the date of the election.
(d) If the primary election ballot includes city, county or nonpartisan offices  or measures, the
county clerk shall mail to each elector who is not  eligible to vote for party candidates a ballot
limited to those offices and measures for which the elector is eligible to vote.
(4) For each elector who  updates a voter registration after the deadline in ORS 247.025, the
county clerk shall make the official ballot,  the return identification envelope and the secrecy en-
velope available either by mail or at the county  clerk’s office or at another place designated by the
county clerk. An elector to whom this subsection applies must request  a ballot from the county
clerk.
(5) The ballot shall contain the following warning:
_______________________________________________________________________________________
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 24
Any person who, by use of force or other means, unduly influences an elector to  vote in any
particular manner or to refrain from voting is subject to a fine.
_______________________________________________________________________________________
(6)(a) Upon receipt of any ballot described in this section, the elector shall mark the  ballot, sign
the return identification envelope supplied  with the ballot and comply with the instructions provided
with the ballot.
(b) The elector may return the marked  ballot to the county clerk by United States mail or by
depositing the ballot at the office of the county clerk, at any place of deposit designated  by the
county clerk or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474.
(c) The ballot must be returned in the return  identification envelope. If the elector returns the
ballot by mail, the elector must provide the postage.
(d) Subject to paragraph (e)  of this subsection, if a person returns a ballot for an elector, the
person shall deposit the ballot in a  manner described in paragraph (b) of this subsection not later
than two days after receiving the ballot.
(e) A ballot must be received at the office of the county clerk,  at the designated place of deposit
or at any location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474 not later than the  end of the period deter-
mined under subsection (1) of this section on the date of the election.
(7) An elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is destroyed,  spoiled, lost or not
received by the elector. Replacement  ballots shall be issued and processed as described in this
section and ORS 254.480. The county clerk shall keep a record of each replacement ballot provided
under this  subsection. Notwithstanding any deadline for mailing ballots in subsection (2) of this
section, a replacement ballot may be mailed, made available in the office  of the county clerk or
made available at  one central location in the electoral district in which the election is conducted.
The county clerk shall designate the central location. A replacement ballot need not  be mailed after
the fifth day before the date of the election.
(8) A ballot shall be counted only if:
(a) It is returned in the return identification envelope;
(b) The envelope is signed by the elector to whom the ballot is issued , unless  a certified
statement is submitted under ORS 254.431 ; and
(c) The signature is verified as provided in subsection (9) of this section.
(9) The county clerk shall verify the signature of  each elector on the return identification en-
velope with the signature on the elector’s  registration record, according to the procedure provided
by rules adopted by  the Secretary of State. If the county clerk determines that an elector to whom
a replacement ballot has been issued has voted more than once, the county clerk  shall count only
one ballot cast by that elector.
(10) At 8 p.m. on election day, electors who are at the county clerk’s office,  a place of deposit
designated under subsection (1) of this section or any  location described in ORS 254.472 or 254.474
and who are in line waiting to vote or deposit a voted ballot shall  be considered to have begun the
act of voting.
SECTION 51.
 ORS 249.002 is amended to read:
249.002. As used in this chapter:
(1) “Candidate” means an individual whose name is or is expected  to be printed on the official
ballot or a write-in candidate .
(2) “County clerk” means the county clerk or the county official in charge of elections.
(3) “Elector” means  an individual qualified to vote under section 2, Article II, Oregon Consti-
tution.
(4) “Judge” means judge of the Supreme Court, Court of Appeals, circuit  court or the Oregon
Tax Court, or any county judge who exercises judicial functions.
(5) “Member” means an individual who is registered as being affiliated with the political party.
(6) “Minor political party” means a political party that  has qualified as a minor political party
under ORS 248.008.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 25
(7) “Nonpartisan office” means the office of judge, Commissioner of the  Bureau of Labor and
Industries, any elected office of a metropolitan service district  under ORS chapter 268, justice of the
peace, county clerk, county assessor, county surveyor,  county treasurer, sheriff, district attorney or
any office designated nonpartisan by a home rule charter.
(8) “Prospective petition” means the information, except signatures and other identification of
petition signers, required to be contained in a completed petition.
(9) “Public  office” means any national, state, county, city or district office or position, except
a political party office, filled by the electors.
(10) “State office” means Governor, Secretary of State,  State Treasurer, Attorney General,
Commissioner of the Bureau of Labor and Industries, judge, state Senator,  state Representative or
district attorney.
SECTION 52.  ORS 249.865 is amended to read:
249.865. (1) Pursuant to section 18, Article II of the Oregon Constitution,  an elector of the
electoral district from which  the public officer is elected may file a petition demanding the recall
of the public officer. Before the petition is circulated for signatures, the chief petitioner of the  pe-
tition shall  file with the officer authorized to order the recall election a copy of the prospective
petition signed by the chief petitioner.
(2) The chief petitioner shall include with the prospective  petition a statement declaring
whether one or more persons will be  paid money or other valuable consideration for obtaining sig-
natures of electors on the recall petition. After the prospective petition is  filed, the chief petitioner
shall notify the filing officer not later than the 10th day after the chief  petitioner first has know-
ledge or should have had knowledge that:
(a) Any person is being paid  for obtaining signatures, when the statement included with the
prospective petition declared that no such person would be paid.
(b) No person is being paid for obtaining signatures, when the statement included  with the
prospective petition declared that one or more such persons would be paid.
(3) Each sheet of the recall petition must contain:
(a) The words “Petition for recall of,” (name and title of officer) and the date of the filing under
subsection (1) of this section; and
(b) The name and address of the treasurer or the chief petitioner listed on  the statement of or-
ganization filed under  ORS 260.118 [ subsection (1) of this section ].
(4) Not more than 20 signatures on each sheet of the recall petition shall  be counted. The
circulator shall certify on each signature sheet that the circulator:
(a) Witnessed the signing of the signature sheet by each individual whose signature appears  on
the signature sheet; and
(b) Believes each individual is an elector.
(5) Any intentional or willful violation of subsection (1)  or (2) of this section by a chief
petitioner of the recall petition or  by the treasurer listed on the statement of organization filed
under ORS 260.118 [ subsection (1)  of this section ] invalidates the prospective petition before it is
circulated for signatures.
SECTION 53.
 ORS 253.575 is amended to read:
253.575. (1) Upon receipt of an application made under ORS  253.565, if the applicant’s residence
is in the county, the county clerk,  without regard to whether the applicant is an elector of the
county, shall mail to the  applicant a special ballot, instructions for filling in and returning the ballot
and an envelope  to use for the return. The [ name, official title and ] office address of the clerk shall
appear on the  front of the envelope. On the back shall appear a statement to be signed by the absent
elector, stating that the elector:
(a) Is qualified to vote;  and
(b) Unless prevented by physical disability, has personally marked the ballot[ ; and ].
[(c) Has not unnecessarily exhibited the marked ballot to any other person. ]
(2) The completed and signed application submitted under ORS 253.565 shall constitute a  valid
registration for the elector.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 26
(3) If the county clerk receives  an application for a special ballot on or after the 45th day before
the election specified in the application, the county clerk shall treat the  application as an applica-
tion made under ORS 253.540.
(4) A military or overseas elector may obtain a replacement ballot if the ballot is  destroyed,
spoiled, lost or not received by the elector. The county  clerk shall keep a record of each replace-
ment ballot provided under this subsection.
(5) Notwithstanding subsection  (3) of this section, a replacement ballot may be mailed or shall
be made available in the office of the county clerk.
(6) If the county clerk determines that a military or overseas  elector to whom a replacement
ballot has been issued at the request of the elector has  voted more than once, the county clerk shall
not count any ballot cast by the elector. If the county  clerk is required to reissue ballots due to a
change on the ballot for  any reason, that ballot shall be counted in lieu of any previous ballot issued
unless:
(a) Only the original ballot was voted and returned; or
(b) The county clerk issued a supplemental ballot that is not a complete replacement  of the or-
iginal ballot.
SECTION 54.
 ORS 260.118 is amended to read:
260.118. (1) The chief petitioners of an initiative, referendum  or recall petition shall appoint a
treasurer. The treasurer shall be an elector of this  state. Contributions shall be received and ex-
penditures made by or through the treasurer.
(2) The treasurer shall file a statement of organization of a petition  committee with the appro-
priate filing officer. The treasurer shall file the statement not  later than the third business day after
a chief petitioner or  the treasurer receives a contribution or makes an expenditure relating to the
initiative, referendum or recall petition. The statement shall include:
(a) The name and address of the chief petitioners.
(b) The name and address of the treasurer appointed under subsection (1) of this section.
(c) A designation of the initiative, referendum or recall petition.  The designation of the recall
petition shall include the name of the officer whose recall is demanded.
(d) The name of the financial institution  in which the petition account required under ORS
260.054 is established, the name of the account, the name of the  account holder and the names of
all individuals who have signature authority for the account. The Secretary of State may not  dis-
close information received by the secretary under this paragraph except as necessary  for purposes
of enforcing the provisions of ORS chapters 246 to 260.
(3) If there is a change in the information submitted in a statement of organization under sub-
section (2) of this section, the treasurer shall file an amended statement of organization not later
than the 10th day after the change in information.
(4) The  treasurer of an initiative, referendum or recall petition committee shall use the elec-
tronic filing system adopted under ORS  260.057 to file with the Secretary of State statements of
contributions received and expenditures made by the petition committee, as  described in ORS
260.083.
(5) The treasurer of an  initiative petition committee shall file a statement described in sub-
section (4) of this section not later than seven calendar days after  a contribution is received or an
expenditure is made. This subsection applies to contributions received and expenditures made:
(a) During the period beginning on the 42nd calendar day before the  date that is four months
before a general election and ending on the date that is four months before a general election; and
(b) During the period beginning on the 42nd calendar day before the date  of any primary
election and ending on the  date of the primary election and the period beginning on the 42nd cal-
endar day before the date of any general election and ending on the date of the general election.
(6) The treasurer of a referendum petition committee or a recall  petition committee shall file a
statement described in subsection (4) of this section  not later than seven calendar days after a
contribution is received or an expenditure is made. This subsection applies:
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 27
(a) For a referendum petition committee, to contributions received and expenditures made dur-
ing the period beginning on  the date the treasurer is appointed under subsection (1) of this section
and ending on the deadline for submitting signatures for verification; and
(b) For a recall petition committee, to contributions received and expenditures  made during the
period beginning on the day [ after the  date on which the statement of contributions received and ex-
penditures made that is required ] on which the recall petition is filed  under ORS 249.865  [ is filed ]
and ending on the deadline for submitting signatures for verification.
(7) Except as provided in subsection (8) of this  section, during a period not described in sub-
section (5) or (6) of this section, a treasurer of an initiative, referendum  or recall petition committee
shall file a statement described in subsection (4) of this  section not later than 30 calendar days after
a contribution is received or an expenditure is made.
(8) If a treasurer of an initiative petition committee receives a contribution or makes  an ex-
penditure prior to the 42nd  calendar day before the date that is four months before a general
election, or the 42nd  day before the date of the primary election or general election, and the
treasurer has not filed a statement of the contribution or expenditure  under subsection (4) of this
section by the 43rd calendar day before the date that is four  months before a general election, or
the 43rd day before the date of  the primary election or general election, the treasurer shall file a
statement described in subsection (4) of this section  not later than the 35th calendar day before the
date that is four months before a general election, or the 35th day  before the date of the primary
election or general election.
(9) For an initiative petition committee, the accounting period for the first  statement filed under
this section begins on the date the treasurer is appointed under subsection (1) of this section.
(10) Each statement required under this section shall be signed and certified as  true by the
treasurer. Signatures shall be supplied in the manner specified by the secretary by rule.
(11) Subsections (4) to (10) of this section do not apply to petition committees that  file certif-
icates under ORS 260.112.
(12) As used in this section, “contribution” and “expenditure” include a contribution  or ex-
penditure to or on behalf of an initiative, referendum or recall petition.
SECTION 55. (1)(a) If all or part of chapter , Oregon Laws  2017 (Enrolled House
Bill 2391), is referred to the people by petition  under Article IV, section 1 (3)(b), of the
Oregon Constitution:
(A) It shall be submitted to the people for their approval  or rejection at a special election
held throughout this state on January 23, 2018; and
(B) A special election shall be held throughout this state on January 23,  2018, as provided
in sections 55 to 61 of this 2017 Act.
(b) If all  or part of chapter , Oregon Laws 2017 (Enrolled House Bill 2017), is re-
ferred to the people by petition under Article IV, section 1  (3)(b), of the Oregon Constitution:
(A) It shall be submitted to the people for their approval  or rejection at a special election
held throughout this state on the same date as the next primary election; and
(B) A special election shall be held throughout this state on the  same date as the next
primary election, as provided in sections 55 to 61 of this 2017 Act.
(2) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (3) or (4) of this section, ORS chapters 250,
251 and 254 apply to an election held on a measure described in subsection (1) of  this section.
(3) Notwithstanding ORS  250.035, 250.067, 250.075 (2) and 250.085, the ballot title for a
measure described in subsection (1) of this section shall be prepared by the joint legislative
committee created under section 60 of this 2017 Act and filed with the Secretary  of State not
later than the date set by  the Secretary of State by rule. The word limits described in ORS
250.035 (2) do not apply to a ballot title prepared by the  joint legislative committee under this
subsection. Unless modified  under section 58 of this 2017 Act, the ballot title prepared by the
committee under this subsection shall be the ballot title printed in  the voters’ pamphlet and
printed on, or included with, the ballot.
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 28
(4) Notwithstanding ORS 251.205, 251.215, 251.225, 251.230 and 251.235,  the explanatory
statement  to  be printed in the voters’ pamphlet for a measure described in subsection (1)
of this section shall be prepared by the joint legislative committee created under  section 60
of this 2017 Act and filed with the Secretary of State not later than the date  set by the
Secretary of State by rule. Unless modified under section 59 of this  2017 Act, the explanatory
statement prepared by the committee under this  subsection shall be the explanatory state-
ment printed in the voters’ pamphlet.
(5) The committee may begin preparation of the ballot title or explanatory statement  on
the date that  a prospective petition to refer a measure described in subsection (1) of this
section is filed with the Secretary of State under ORS 250.045.
(6)(a) Arguments relating to a measure  described in subsection (1) of this section may
be filed with the Secretary of State under ORS 251.245 and 251.255, except that an argument
must be filed not later than the date set by the Secretary of State by rule.
(b) Notwithstanding ORS  192.410 to 192.505 relating to public records, an argument filed
under this subsection is exempt  from public inspection until the fourth business day after
the deadline for filing the argument.
(7) Notwithstanding the time  frames set forth in ORS 250.125 and 250.127, the financial
estimate committee created under ORS  250.125 shall prepare and file with the Secretary of
State the estimates described  in ORS 250.125 and, if the committee considers it necessary,
a statement explaining the  financial effects of the measure as described in ORS 250.125, ex-
cept that the committee shall prepare and file the  estimates or statements not later than
the date set by the  Secretary of State by rule. The financial estimate committee may begin
preparation of the estimate or statement on the  date that a prospective petition to refer a
measure described in subsection (1) of this section is filed with  the Secretary of State under
ORS 250.045.
(8) Notwithstanding ORS 250.131 (2), the Supreme Court shall conduct a review  under
ORS 250.131 if a petition is filed not later than the date set by the Secretary  of State by rule.
(9) As used in sections 55 to 61 of this 2017 Act, “measure” has the meaning given that
term in ORS 250.005.
SECTION 56.
(1) The Secretary of State shall cause to be printed in the voters’ pamphlet
the number, ballot title and text of a measure described in section 55 of this 2017 Act  and
the financial estimate, explanatory  statement and arguments relating to the measure. The
Secretary of State shall also cause to be printed in the  voters’ pamphlet any other material
required by law. Notwithstanding ORS 251.026, the Secretary of State shall include  in the
voters’ pamphlet the information or statements described in ORS 251.026 that the Secretary
of State  considers applicable to the election on a measure described in section 55 of this 2017
Act.
(2) For purposes of sections 55 to 61 of this 2017 Act, the election  referred to in ORS
251.295 is the special election held on the date specified in section 55 of this 2017 Act.
(3) If the measure described in section 55 (1)(a) of this 2017 Act is referred to  the people
by petition under Article IV, section 1 (3)(b), of the Oregon Constitution:
(a) Notwithstanding ORS 251.285 and subject to ORS 251.008, the measure referred to  in
this subsection shall be  the only measure included in the voters’ pamphlet prepared for the
special election held on January 23, 2018.
(b) Not later than the 10th day before the election, the Secretary of State shall  cause the
voters’ pamphlet to be mailed to each post-office mailing address in Oregon and  may use any
additional means of distribution necessary to make the pamphlet available to electors.
(c) In preparing the voters’ pamphlet for the special election to be held  on January 23,
2018, the Secretary of State is  not required to comply with ORS chapter 279B relating to
competitive bidding.
SECTION 57.
(1) Notwithstanding the deadline in ORS 254.085, the Secretary  of State
shall prepare and deliver to each county clerk by the most expeditious  means practicable a
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 29
certified statement of a measure described in section 55 of this 2017 Act. The Secretary  of
State shall include with the statement the number, financial estimate  and ballot title of the
measure, and any other information required by law. The  Secretary of State shall keep a
copy of the statement.
(2) The county clerks shall print on the ballot the  number, financial estimate and ballot
title of the measure, along with any other  material required by law. In lieu of printing the
financial estimate, the summary portion of the ballot title or other  material required by law
on the ballot, a county clerk may include with the ballot the complete text of the  ballot title,
the financial estimate and any other material required by law.
SECTION 58. Notwithstanding ORS 250.085:
(1) Any elector dissatisfied with the ballot title for a measure described in section 55 of
this 2017 Act prepared by the joint  legislative committee created under section 60 of this 2017
Act may petition the Supreme Court seeking a  different ballot title. The petition shall state
the reasons that the ballot title filed with the Secretary  of State does not substantially
comply with the requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 55 of this 2017 Act.
(2) The petition shall name the Attorney General as the respondent  and must be filed not
later than the fifth business day after the Legislative Assembly  files the ballot title with the
Secretary of State.
(3) An elector filing a petition under this section shall notify  the Secretary of State in
writing that the petition has been  filed. The notice must be received in the office of the
Secretary of State not later than 5 p.m. on the next business day following the  day the pe-
tition is filed.
(4) The  Supreme Court shall review the ballot title for substantial compliance with the
requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 55 of this 2017 Act.
(5) The  review by the Supreme Court shall be conducted expeditiously to ensure the or-
derly and timely conduct  of the election at which the measure is to be submitted to the
electors.
(6) If the Supreme Court determines that the ballot title prepared by the Legislative
Assembly substantially complies with the requirements of ORS 250.035 and  section 55 of this
2017 Act,  the court shall certify the ballot title to the Secretary of State. If the Supreme
Court determines that the ballot title prepared by the Legislative  Assembly does not sub-
stantially comply with the  requirements of ORS 250.035 and section 55 of this 2017 Act, the
court shall modify the ballot title and certify the ballot  title to the Secretary of State or
refer the ballot title to the Attorney General for modification.
(7) Not later than  five business days after the Supreme Court refers a ballot title to the
Attorney General for modification under  this section, the Attorney General shall certify a
modified ballot  title to the Secretary of State. The modified ballot title is not subject to ju-
dicial review.
SECTION 59. Notwithstanding ORS 251.235:
(1) Any person dissatisfied with the explanatory statement for  a measure described in
section 55 of this 2017 Act prepared by the joint legislative committee created under section
60 of this 2017 Act may petition the Supreme Court seeking a different explanatory statement
and stating the reasons the explanatory statement filed with the court is insufficient or  un-
clear.
(2) The court shall review the explanatory statement and  certify an explanatory state-
ment to the Secretary of State if the petition is filed and served as required  in subsection
(4) of this section not later than the fifth business  day after the Legislative Assembly files
the explanatory statement with the Secretary of State.
(3) Failure to  file and serve the petition within the time prescribed in subsection (2) of
this section  precludes Supreme Court review and certification of an explanatory statement.
If the court considers the petition, the court may allow oral  argument. The review by the
Supreme Court shall be conducted expeditiously to  ensure the orderly and timely conduct
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 30
of the  election at which the measure is to be submitted to the electors. The explanatory
statement certified by the court shall be the explanatory statement printed in the voters’
pamphlet.
(4) At the time a person  petitions the Supreme Court under subsection (1) of this section,
the person also shall serve a copy of the petition on:
(a) The Attorney General;
(b) The Legislative Assembly; and
(c) The chief petitioners of the measure.
SECTION 60.
(1) For each measure described in section 55 of this 2017 Act, a joint legis-
lative committee consisting of three  Senators and three Representatives shall be appointed
to prepare the ballot title and explanatory statement for the measure.
(2)(a) The President of the Senate shall appoint three members of a  committee from
among members of the Senate, two from the majority  party and one from the minority
party.
(b) The Speaker of the House of Representatives shall  appoint three members of a com-
mittee from among members of the House of Representatives, two from the majority party
and one from the minority party.
SECTION 61.
The Secretary of State shall adopt rules governing the procedures for con-
ducting an election on  a measure described in section 55 of this 2017 Act as may be necessary
to implement sections 55 to 61 of this 2017 Act.
SECTION 62. ORS 247.435 is repealed.
SECTION 63. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by Senate May 24, 2017
Repassed by Senate July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Lori L. Brocker, Secretary of Senate
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Passed by House July 6, 2017
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled Senate Bill 229 (SB 229-C) Page 31